src/morphology/stemparts/acronyms.lexc
LEXICON ACRO_OHMI

0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0    #   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS    ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT   ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:%:n ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:a    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:iin   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:lla   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:sta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:na    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssa   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi   ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%:ien   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ja    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin  ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:ina   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[CASE=COM]:%:ine  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ista  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON ACRO_DOLLARI

0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0    #   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS    ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT   ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:%:n ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:a    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:iin   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:lla   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:sta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:na    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssa   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi   ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%:ien   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%:iden   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%:itten   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ja   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ita   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin  ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:ina   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[CASE=COM]:%:ine  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ista  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON ACRO_PUNTA

0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0    #   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS    ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT   ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:%:n ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:aa    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:aan   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:lla   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:sta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:na    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssa   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi   ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%:ien   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ia    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:iin  ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:ina   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[CASE=COM]:%:ine  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ista  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
